Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-885.15
Fees; deposited in State Real Estate Commission's Fund; investment.

All fees collected under the Nebraska Real Estate License Act shall be deposited in the state treasury in a fund to be known as the State Real Estate Commission's Fund. The commission may use such part of the money in this fund as is necessary to be used by it in the administration and enforcement of the act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature through June 30, 2019. The State Real Estate Commission's Fund shall be paid out only upon proper vouchers and upon warrants issued by the Director of Administrative Services and countersigned by the State Treasurer, as provided by law. The expenses of conducting the office must always be kept within the income collected and deposited with the State Treasurer by such commission and such office, and the expense thereof shall not be supported or paid from any other state fund. Any money in the State Real Estate Commission's Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred thousand dollars from the State Real Estate Commission's Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred thousand dollars from the State Real Estate Commission's Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2019, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 15;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 14;

Laws 2009, LB30, § 6;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 68;

Laws 2017, LB331, § 49.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.